Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Chapter 16

Nursing Home Administrators

63-16-101. Chapter definitions.

As used in this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Board” means the board of examiners for nursing home administrators;

“Division” means the division of health related boards in the department of health;

“Nursing home” means any institution or facility defined as such pursuant to Tennessee state law or the rules and regulations for nursing homes promulgated by the department. “Nursing home” applies equally to Christian Science sanatoria and services therein;

“Nursing home administrator” means any individual responsible for planning, organizing, directing or controlling the operation of a nursing home or who in fact performs such functions, whether or not such functions are shared by one (1) or more other people;

“Practice of nursing home administration” means the planning, organizing, directing or controlling the operation of a nursing home; and

“Single state agency” means the department of health.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1601; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 14.

Cross-References. Deficient nursing homes, title 68, ch. 11, part 8.

Liability of professional societies, title 62, ch. 50, part 1.

Patient transfers, title 68, ch. 11, part 7.

Registry of persons who have abused or intentionally neglected elderly or vulnerable individuals, title 68, ch. 11, part 10.

Rights of nursing home residents and patients, and members of the public regarding nursing homes, title 68, ch. 11, part 9.

State examining boards, general provisions, title 4, ch. 19.

63-16-102. Board of examiners — Composition.

There is hereby created the board of examiners for nursing home administrators, which shall consist of eight (8) members to be appointed by the governor as follows:

Four (4) members shall be representatives of the nursing home industry, three (3) of whom may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted to the governor by interested healthcare groups including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Health Care Association, and one (1) of whom shall be a nursing home administrator who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested hospital groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Hospital Association;

One (1) member shall be a hospital administrator who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested hospital groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Hospital Association;

One (1) member shall be a physician who may be appointed from a list of qualified physician nominees submitted by interested medical groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Medical Association;

One (1) member shall be a nurse representative who may be appointed from lists of qualified persons submitted by interested nursing groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Nurses Association; and

One (1) member shall be a consumer representative.

Each member shall serve for three (3) years, except that initially three (3) members shall be appointed for a term of three (3) years, three (3) members for a term of two (2) years, and two (2) members for a term of one (1) year. At the expiration of a member's term, each interested group may submit lists of qualified persons to the governor for appointment to that vacancy in the same manner as provided for initial appointments in subsection (a). Any vacancy occurring on the board prior to the expiration of a member's term may also be filled by the governor for the unexpired term from lists of qualified persons submitted by the interested groups as provided for initial appointments in subsection (a).

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) person serving on the board is sixty (60) years of age or older and that at least one (1) person serving on the board is a member of a racial minority.

The governor shall consult with interested medical groups, including, but not limited to, the nominating associations for the respective classifications listed in subsection (a) to determine qualified persons to fill the positions. This subdivision (b)(3) shall not apply to the appointment of the consumer representative member.

The commissioner of health or the commissioner's designated representative shall serve as an ex officio member and as the executive officer of the board.

The governor may remove any member for misconduct, incapacity, incompetence or neglect of duty after the member so charged has been served with a written statement of charges and has been given an opportunity to be heard.

Each member shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of the member's official duties, in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations as promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter. In addition, each member shall be compensated fifty dollars ($50.00) per day for the member's services. All vouchers for the expenditure of any funds shall be signed by the executive officer of the board.

The board shall meet at least annually and a majority of the board shall constitute a quorum.

Any member who misses more than fifty percent (50%) of the scheduled meetings in a calendar year shall be removed as a member of the board in accordance with subsection (d).

The executive officer of the board shall promptly notify, or cause to be notified, the appointing authority of any member who fails to satisfy the attendance requirement as prescribed in subdivision (f)(2)(A).

The division, as provided for in § 68-1-101, is the administrative agency for the board of examiners for nursing home administrators.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 2; 1971, ch. 81, § 4; 1972, ch. 574, §§ 1, 2; 1976, ch. 806, § 1(121); 1979, ch. 118, § 1; 1980, ch. 587, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1602; Acts 1983, ch. 40, § 1; 1988, ch. 1013, § 54; 1990, ch. 1042, §§ 3-5; 2012, ch. 721, §§ 3, 4; 2016, ch. 611, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. Acts 1990, ch. 1042, § 6 provided that the amendment by that act, which amended subdivisions (a)(1) and (2) and deleted former subdivision (a)(3), shall not be interpreted to authorize the appointment of either a registered lobbyist or a nonresident of the state of Tennessee to any regulatory board affected by the amendment.

The board of examiners for nursing home administrators, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2022. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-243.

Cross-References. Meetings, director of health-related licensing division as ex officio member, § 63-1-133.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

Attorney General Opinions. Delegation of Governor’s appointing authority to private entities for purpose of submitting lists for appointments to state licensing boards or agencies. OAG 10-67, 2010 Tenn. AG LEXIS 73 (5/17/10).

63-16-103. Duties of the board.

It is the function and duty of the board to:

Develop, impose and enforce standards that must be met by individuals in order to receive a license as a nursing home administrator, which standards are designed to ensure that nursing home administrators are individuals who are of good character and otherwise suitable and who, by training or experience in the field of institutional administration, are qualified to serve as nursing home administrators;

Develop and apply appropriate techniques, including examinations and investigations, for determining whether an individual meets such standards;

Issue a license to individuals determined, after the application of such techniques, to meet such standards and authorize the state licensing board to revoke or suspend licenses previously issued in any case where the individual holding any such license is determined by the board to have substantially failed to conform to the requirements of such standards;

Establish and carry out procedures designed to ensure that individuals licensed as nursing home administrators will, during any period that they serve as such, comply with the requirements of such standards;

Receive, investigate and take appropriate action with respect to any charge or complaint filed with the board to the effect that any individual licensed as a nursing home administrator has failed to comply with the requirements of such standards;

Conduct a continuing study and investigation of nursing homes and administrators of nursing homes within the state with a view to the improvement of standards imposed for the licensing of such administrators and of procedures and methods for the enforcement of such standards with respect to administrators of nursing homes who have been licensed as such;

Conduct or cause to be conducted courses of instruction and training sufficient to meet the requirements of this chapter. In lieu thereof, the board may approve courses conducted by other groups or organizations;

Have the authority to adopt, promulgate and enforce rules and regulations necessary for the proper performance of its duties; and

The single state agency has the authority to receive and disburse federal funds pursuant to § 1908(e)(1) of the Social Security Act (42 U.S.C. 1396g(e)(1)).

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-1603; Acts 1985, ch. 120, § 15.

63-16-104. Qualifications for licensure.

An applicant for a license shall submit evidence of good moral character and suitability prescribed by the board and that the applicant:

Is at least eighteen (18) years of age;

Is a citizen of the United States or legally in this country;

Has completed preliminary education satisfactory to the board; and

Has paid a nonrefundable application fee as set annually by the board no later than fifty (50) days in advance of the next scheduled examination.

Such applicant, upon notification by the board that the applicant has fulfilled the requirements for admission and upon payment of an examination fee as set annually by the board shall be admitted to the examination.

No applicant for license as a nursing home administrator shall be admitted to such licensing examination, nor be entitled to a license or to be certified to the state licensing board for issuance of a license as a nursing home administrator, unless the applicant has graduated from a high school or secondary school approved by the state in which the school is located or has submitted a certificate indicating that the applicant has obtained high school or secondary school equivalency, such certificate being duly certified by state educational authorities.

The board has the authority to grant a temporary license, not to exceed six (6) months, to an individual applying for licensure to fill a position of nursing home administrator that unexpectedly becomes vacant. To receive a temporary license, the individual must either be licensed in another state or meet the majority of the board's standards for licensure. If the individual holding a temporary license must take the board required examination to be fully licensed and fails to achieve the required scores, the temporary license shall be revoked.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 4; impl. am. Acts 1971, ch. 161, § 3; Acts 1976, ch. 444, § 1; 1981, ch. 464, § 1; T.C.A., § 63-1604; Acts 1987, ch. 247, §§ 1, 2, 8; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 83, 84.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-16-105. Examination for license.

The board shall determine the subjects of examination for applicants for licensure as nursing home administrators. The board shall also determine the scope, content and format of such an examination, which in any examination shall be the same for all candidates; however, all examinations must include testing of the applicant's proficiency in the rules and regulations of health and safety.

Any applicant having failed to achieve a passing grade, score or level of proficiency as determined by the board on such examination is not prohibited from taking successive examinations; provided, that such applicant pays the examination fee set by the board pursuant to § 63-16-104 for each successive examination.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 5; 1976, ch. 444, § 2; 1981, ch. 464, § 2; T.C.A., § 63-1605; Acts 1987, ch. 247, § 3.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-16-106. License issuance and registration.

An applicant for a license as a nursing home administrator shall be certified to the division for issuance of a license certifying that the applicant has met the requirements of the law, rules and regulations entitling the applicant to practice as a nursing home administrator who has:

Complied with the requirements of § 63-16-104 and the standards provided in § 63-16-104; and

Passed the examination provided for in § 63-16-105.

The license must be registered annually as required by the state licensing board pursuant to § 63-1-107.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 6; T.C.A., § 63-1606.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

63-16-107. Certificates of registration — Renewal of registration — Continuing education.

Each individual who is initially issued a license as a nursing home administrator is deemed registered with the board and shall be issued a certificate of registration.

Certificates of registration expire each odd-numbered year.

Each licensed nursing home administrator shall submit an application to the board for a new certificate of registration and submit, along with any information requested by the board, a biennial renewal fee as set by the board.

Although the license renewal is on a biennial basis, continuing education is required on an annual basis.

The board shall promulgate, in accordance with the procedures of the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, such rules as shall be necessary to prescribe programs of continuing education for nursing home administrators and to designate the levels of participation required in programs of continuing education. As a prerequisite for renewal of registration, an individual shall submit to the board satisfactory proof of attendance and participation in such programs.

Upon receipt of such application for registration and the registration fee, the board shall issue a certificate of registration to such nursing home administrator unless the board finds reason to deny the same pursuant to § 63-16-108, under the rules and regulations developed by the board.

If a nursing home administrator fails to renew the nursing home administrator's license and pays the biennial renewal fee after renewal becomes due, the license of such person is automatically revoked without further notice or hearing unless renewal is made and all fees are paid prior to the expiration of sixty (60) days from the date such renewal becomes due.

Any person whose license is automatically revoked as provided in this section may have the license reinstated by the board in its discretion upon good cause being shown, upon payment of all past due renewal fees and upon the further payment of a nonrefundable sum as set by the board.

Any person licensed to practice by this chapter who has retired or may hereafter retire from such practice in this state shall not be made to register as required by this chapter if such person files with the board an affidavit on a form to be furnished by the board, which affidavit states the date on which such person retired from such practice and such other facts as tend to verify such retirement as the board deems necessary. If such person thereafter reengages in such practice in this state, such person shall apply for registration with the board as provided by this chapter and shall meet other requirements as may be set by the board.

The commissioner of health shall notify the board of all cases in which a nursing home is sanctioned by suspension of admissions or imposition of a civil monetary penalty or in which the commissioner determines that the quality of care provided to residents is seriously inadequate due to acts or omissions of the administrator. In all such cases, the license or certificate of registration of any person who has engaged in the practice of nursing home administration at that facility during the year preceding the imposition of sanctions or the commissioner's finding of inadequacy shall not be renewed by the board, until the board has reviewed all information compiled by regulatory agencies pertaining to the quality of care rendered at facilities under the person's administration. Following such review, the board may renew the license or certificate of registration only upon an affirmative finding that the person can be expected to satisfactorily discharge the duties of an administrator in the future, in a manner that assures an adequate level of care for nursing home residents.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter to the contrary, the division, with the approval of the commissioner, shall establish a system of license renewals at alternative intervals that will allow for the distribution of the license workload as uniformly as is practicable throughout the calendar year. Licenses issued under the alternative method are valid for twenty-four (24) months and expire on the last day of the last month of the license period. However, during a transition period, or at any time thereafter when the board determines that the volume of work for any given interval is unduly burdensome or costly, either the licenses or renewals, or both of them, may be issued for terms of not less than six (6) months nor more than eighteen (18) months. The fee imposed for any license under the alternative interval method for a period of other than twenty-four (24) months shall be proportionate to the annual fee and modified in no other manner, except that the proportional fee shall be rounded off to the nearest quarter of a dollar (25¢).

No renewal application will be accepted after the last day of the month following the license expiration date under the alternative method authorized in this subsection (f).

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 7; 1973, ch. 166, § 6; 1981, ch. 464, § 3; T.C.A., § 63-1607; Acts 1983, ch. 40, § 2; 1987, ch. 247, §§ 4-6; 1987, ch. 312, § 6; 1989, ch. 360, §§ 52-54; 1989, ch. 523, §§ 85, 86.

Cross-References. Licensure, §§ 63-1-103 — 63-1-112.

Law Reviews.

Selected Tennessee Legislation of 1983 (N. L. Resener, J. A. Whitson, K. J. Miller), 50 Tenn. L. Rev. 785 (1983).

63-16-108. Suspension or revocation of license or registration — Discipline — Reissuance of license or registration.

The license and/or registration of any person practicing or offering to practice nursing home administration or the license of a nursing home administrator holding a provisional license may be revoked or suspended, or the licensee be disciplined in accordance with this section upon decision and after due hearing by the board in any of the following cases:

Upon proof that the licensee is unfit or incompetent by reasons of negligence, habits or other causes;

Upon proof that the licensee has willfully or repeatedly violated this chapter or the rules or regulations promulgated in accordance therewith; or willfully or repeatedly acted in a manner inconsistent with the health and safety of the patients in the home in which the licensee is the administrator;

Upon proof that the licensee is guilty of fraud or deceit in the practice of nursing home administration; or

Upon proof that the licensee has been convicted of a felony in a court of competent jurisdiction, either within or without this state.

The members of the board have jurisdiction to hear all charges brought under this section against persons licensed and registered as nursing home administrators or nursing home administrators holding a provisional license and, upon such hearing, shall determine the charges upon their merits. The board or hearing officer designated as such by the board, acting in an official capacity, has the authority to issue subpoenas, compel the attendance of witnesses, administer oaths and take testimony concerning all matters within the jurisdiction of the board. The board is not bound by the strict rules of evidence in the conduct of its proceedings, but any determinations made shall be founded upon sufficient legal evidence to sustain them.

If the board determines that a person is guilty of the charges, the board may direct revocation of the person's license and/or revoke the person's registration, suspend the person from practice or otherwise discipline the licensee.

In all disciplinary proceedings of a licensee, the holder shall be given thirty (30) days' written notice of the hearing. The Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5, apply to all disciplinary proceedings of the board and all regulations promulgated pursuant to this chapter.

If the board suspends the licensee, it may also specify conditions to be met by the licensee during the period of suspension in order to entitle the licensee to again qualify for the license. The board may, in its discretion, after hearing, hold the case under advisement and make a recommendation as to the requirements to be met by the licensee in order to avoid suspension, revocation or other disciplinary actions. In such cases the board shall enter an order accordingly and notify the licensee by registered mail. If the licensee complies with such order and proves that fact to the satisfaction of the board, the board may enter an order showing satisfactory compliance in dismissing the case because of such compliance.

The board may, in its discretion, certify for licensure and/or registration any person whose license and/or registration has been revoked. Application for the reissuance of a license and/or registration shall not be made prior to one (1) year after revocation, and shall be made in such manner as the board may direct. Any licensee or applicant for a license aggrieved by the action of the board may have such action reviewed pursuant to title 27, chapter 9.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 8; 1980, ch. 587, §§ 2, 3; T.C.A., § 63-1608; Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 33.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (g).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Cross-References. Certified mail in lieu of registered mail, § 1-3-111.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

Law Reviews.

Tennessee Civil Disabilities: A Systemic Approach (Neil P. Cohen), 41 Tenn. L. Rev. 253 (1974).

63-16-109. Reciprocity.

The board may approve and authorize issuance of a nursing home administrator license without examination to any person who holds a current license as a nursing home administrator from another jurisdiction, upon payment of a nonrefundable application fee as set annually by the board and upon proper registration and payment of the annual fee provided in this chapter, if the board finds that the applicant's personal qualifications and education are at least substantially equivalent to the licensure standards in this state.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 9; 1981, ch. 464, § 4; T.C.A., § 63-1609; Acts 1986, ch. 719, § 1; 1987, ch. 247, § 7; 1989, ch. 523, § 87.

63-16-110. Certain religious groups exempt.

Nothing in this chapter or the rules and regulations thereunder shall be construed to require an applicant for a license who is certified by a recognized church or religious denomination that teaches reliance on spiritual means alone for healing to demonstrate proficiency in any medical techniques or to meet any medical educational qualifications or medical standards not in accordance with remedial care and treatment provided in such institutions.

Such administrative practice is limited to institutions certified by such church or denominations for the care and treatment of the sick in accordance with its teachings.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 10; T.C.A., § 63-1610.

63-16-111. Penalties.

It is unlawful for any person to sell or fraudulently obtain or furnish any license or aid or abet therein or practice as a nursing home administrator, under cover of any license or registration illegally or fraudulently obtained, or practice as a nursing home administrator or offer to practice unless the person is duly licensed and registered to so practice under this chapter, or practice as a nursing home administrator during the time the person's licensure registration issued under this chapter shall be suspended or revoked, or otherwise violate this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the board pursuant to this chapter.

No nursing home in the state may operate unless it is under the supervision of an administrator who holds a currently valid nursing home administrator license and registration or provisional license issued pursuant to this chapter.

Any person convicted of violating this section shall be fined not less than fifty dollars ($50.00) and not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250).

For the purposes of this section, each day's operation constitutes a separate offense.

It is the duty of the district attorneys general in the various districts throughout the state to assist the board by prosecuting any person the board has reasonable cause to believe is violating any provisions of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the board pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 11; T.C.A., § 63-1611.

Compiler's Notes. The penalty provisions in this section may have been affected by the Criminal Sentencing Reform Act of 1989. See §§ 39-11-114, 40-35-110, 40-35-111.

Cross-References. Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Law Reviews.

The Tennessee Court Systems — Prosecution, 8 Mem. St. L. Rev. 477.

63-16-112. Enjoining violations.

The board may cause to be instituted a civil action in any court of competent jurisdiction for injunctive relief to prevent any violation of any provision of this chapter or any rule or regulation adopted and promulgated by the board pursuant to this chapter.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 12; T.C.A., § 63-1612.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

63-16-113. Disposition of fines and receipts — Budgetary allotments.

All fines for the offenses of the violation of this chapter and fees received from all sources and purposes shall be paid to the board and shall become part of its receipts. All moneys received by the board shall be paid into the general fund of the state.

The commissioner of finance and administration shall make such allotments out of the general fund as may be necessary for the implementation of this chapter. Such allotments shall be disbursed under the general budgetary laws of Tennessee.

Acts 1970, ch. 565, § 13; T.C.A., § 63-1613; modified.

Cross-References. Disposition of fines and penalties, operating expenses, § 63-1-113.

Funds, deposits and disbursements, § 63-1-137.

License and registration fees, § 63-1-112.

63-16-114. Temporary administration following unexpected loss of administrator.

Notwithstanding this chapter to the contrary, a nursing home licensed in Tennessee may be administered on a temporary basis after the unexpected loss of an administrator in accordance with title 68, chapter 11, part 2.

Acts 1994, ch. 813, § 2.

63-16-115. Cost of prosecution — Witnesses — Subpoenas.

The board shall promulgate rules governing the assessment of costs against a licensee or other person found by the board to have violated any provision of this chapter. The costs assessed by the board may include only those costs directly related to the prosecution of the charges against the licensee or other person, including investigatory costs where appropriate. The board shall determine the appropriate amount of costs, if any, to be assessed in a contested case. These costs shall be reasonable and proportionate in light of the violation committed by the licensee or other person.

Any elected officer of the board or any duly appointed or elected chair has the authority to administer oaths to witnesses. Upon probable cause being established, the board, by a vote of two thirds (2/3) of the members to which the board is entitled, may issue subpoenas for the attendance of witnesses and the production of documents and records.

Service of a subpoena issued by the board shall be made by the sheriff of the county of residence of the licensee or person upon whom the subpoena is served.

A licensee or person served by subpoena shall have thirty (30) days to request in writing a hearing before the board for the sole purpose of making a special appearance to quash or modify the subpoena. The subpoena for attendance of the person or the production of books and records shall be stayed until the board votes upon the request to quash or modify the subpoena. A majority vote of the members to which the board is entitled shall be required to quash or modify a subpoena.

A motion to appeal from a decision by the board regarding a request to quash or modify a subpoena shall be made to the chancery court in Davidson County within fifteen (15) days of such decision.

If any witness fails or refuses to obey a subpoena issued by it, the board is authorized to make application to any court of record in this state within the jurisdiction of which the witness is found or resides, and the court shall have power to attach the body of the witness and compel the witness to appear before the board and give testimony or produce books, records or papers as ordered. Any failure to obey the court order may be punished by the court issuing the order as a civil contempt.

Each witness who appears before the board by order of the board shall receive for attendance the compensation provided by law for attendance of witnesses in a court of record, which shall be paid from the funds of the board in the same manner as all other expenses of the board are paid.

Acts 1999, ch. 438, § 3.

Cross-References. Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Attorney General Opinions. The board of examiners for nursing home administrators has authority to issue administrative subpoenas to compel the attendance of witnesses or the production of documents prior to the commencement of an administrative action, OAG 01-055, 2001 Tenn. AG LEXIS 47 (4/10/01).